Arkansas, session 2025, HB1506.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 21, Chapter 1, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
21-1-107. Deduction of Labor Organization Membership Fees Prohibited —
Definitions.
(a) As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) "Labor organization" means an organization in which
public employees may participate that exists for the purpose of dealing with
public employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay,
hours of employment, or conditions of work.
(B) "Labor organization" includes without limitation a:
(i) Labor union exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C.
§ 501(c)(5) as it existed on January 1, 2025; or
*LGL084*
02/17/2025 1:41:41 PM LGL084

HB1506
(ii) A professional employee association exempt from
taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(6) as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(2) "Public employee" means a person who performs a full-time or
part-time service for wages, salary, or other remuneration for a public
employer;
(3) "Public employer" means:
(A) An agency, department, board, commission, division,
office, bureau, council, authority, or other instrumentality of the State of
Arkansas, including the offices of the various Arkansas elected
constitutional officers and the General Assembly and its agencies, bureaus,
and divisions;
(B) A state-supported college, university, technical
college, community college, or other institution of higher education or a
department, division, or agency of a state institution of higher education;
(C) The Supreme Court, the Court of Appeals, the
Administrative Office of the Courts, circuit courts, district courts, and
prosecuting attorneys' offices; and
(D) An office, department, commission, council, agency,
board, bureau, committee, corporation, or other instrumentality of a county
government or a municipality, a county subordinate service district, a
municipally owned utility, or a regional or joint governing body of one (1)
or more counties or municipalities; and
(4)(A) "Public safety employee" means a public employee who is:
(i) Engaged in official duty with the power to
arrest for a criminal violation; or
(ii) Employed for the primary purpose of:
(a) Enforcing the incarceration or supervised
release of a criminal offender;
(b) Preventing or suppressing fire;
(c) Providing emergency medical response,
treatment, or transportation;
(d) Defending the state; or
(e) Performing other emergency services
necessary for the protection of life or property.
(B) "Public safety employee" includes a public employee
employed to support or direct the functions of public safety employees.
02/17/2025 1:41:41 PM LGL084

HB1506
(b)(1) Except as provided under subdivision (b)(2) of this section, a
public employer shall not deduct from the compensation of a public employee a
due, fee, or contribution to a labor organization.
(2) Subdivision (b)(1) of this section does not apply to a
public safety employee.































02/17/2025 1:41:41 PM LGL084